Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
CHAPTER 4 Interest and Usury

Cross references.

Duty of Department of Banking and Finance to receive and investigate complaints and allegations regarding violations of interest and usury laws, §

7-1-99

.

Illegal payday loans, §

16-17-1

et seq.

Interest rate management agreements, §

36-82-250

et seq.

Law reviews.

For note discussing the law of usury in Georgia, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1972).

For note discussing transfer fees in home loan assumptions in reference to the Georgia usury laws, see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 454 (1975).

For article discussing developments in Georgia usury law in 1976 to 1977, see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 41 (1977).

For annual survey of commercial law, see 35 Mercer L. Rev. 53 (1983).

For annual survey on commercial law, see 36 Mercer L. Rev. 115 (1984).

For survey article on commercial law, see 44 Mercer L. Rev. 99 (1992).

For note, “State-Imposed Interest Rate Ceilings and Home Equity Loan Scandal in Georgia,” see 11 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 591 (1995).